Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-524
Aquatic invasive species; wild or nonnative animals; importation, possession, or release; prohibition; violation; penalty.

(1) It shall be unlawful for any person, partnership, limited liability company, association, or corporation to import into the state or possess aquatic invasive species, the animal known as the San Juan rabbit, or any other species of wild vertebrate animal, including domesticated cervine animals as defined in section 54-2914, declared by the commission following public hearing and consultation with the Department of Agriculture to constitute a serious threat to economic or ecologic conditions, except that the commission may authorize by specific written permit the acquisition and possession of such species for educational or scientific purposes. It shall also be unlawful to release to the wild any nonnative bird or nonnative mammal without written authorization from the commission. Any person, partnership, limited liability company, association, or corporation violating the provisions of this subsection shall be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor.

(2) Following public hearing and consultation with the Department of Agriculture, the commission may, by rule and regulation, regulate or limit the importation and possession of any aquatic invasive species or wild vertebrate animal, including a domesticated cervine animal as defined in section 54-2914, which is found to constitute a serious threat to economic or ecologic conditions.

Laws 1957, c. 139, § 20, p. 474;

Laws 1967, c. 222, § 1, p. 597;

Laws 1973, LB 331, § 7;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 205;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 203;

Laws 1993, LB 830, § 9;

Laws 1995, LB 718, § 5;

R.S.Supp.,1996, § 37-719;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 244;

Laws 2012, LB391, § 8;

Laws 2020, LB344, § 62.

Domesticated Cervine Animal Act, possession of certain animals prohibited, see section 54-2324.